Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1668.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 340A.404, subdivision 4a, is amended to read: Subd. 4a. Publicly owned recreation; entertainment facilities. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, local ordinance, or charter provision, the commissioner may issue on-sale intoxicating liquor licenses: (1) to the state agency administratively responsible for, or to an entity holding a concession or facility management contract with such agency for beverage sales at, the premises of any Giants Ridge Recreation Area building or recreational improvement area owned by the state in the city of Biwabik, St. Louis County; (2) to the state agency administratively responsible for, or to an entity holding a concession or facility management contract with such agency for beverage sales at, the premises of any Ironworld Discovery Center building or facility owned by the state at Chisholm; (3) to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota new text begin or to an entity holding a concessions contract with the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota new text end for events at Northrop Auditorium, the intercollegiate football stadium, including any games played by the Minnesota Vikings at the stadium, and deleted text begin at no more than sevendeleted text end new text begin fornew text end other locations within the boundaries of the University of Minnesotanew text begin that are described in the approved license applicationsnew text end , provided that the Board of Regents has approved an application for a license for the specified location and provided that a license for an intercollegiate football stadium is void unless it meets the conditions of paragraph (b). new text begin Licenses may be issued for space that is not compact and contiguous, provided that all space is included in the description of the licensed premises on the approved license applications. new text end It is solely within the discretion of the Board of Regents to choose the manner in which to carry out these conditions consistent with the requirements of paragraph (b); and (4) to the Duluth Entertainment and Convention Center Authority for beverage sales on the premises of the Duluth Entertainment and Convention Center Arena during intercollegiate hockey games. The commissioner shall charge a fee for licenses issued under this subdivision in an amount comparable to the fee for comparable licenses issued in surrounding cities. (b) No alcoholic beverage may be sold or served at deleted text begin TCFdeleted text end new text begin Huntingtonnew text end Bank Stadium unless the Board of Regents holds an on-sale intoxicating liquor license for the stadium as provided in paragraph (a), clause (3), that provides for the sale of intoxicating liquor at a location in the stadium that is convenient to the general public attending an intercollegiate football game at the stadium. On-sale liquor sales to the general public must be available at that location through half-time of an intercollegiate football game at deleted text begin TCFdeleted text end new text begin Huntingtonnew text end Bank Stadium, and sales at the stadium must comply with section 340A.909. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 340A.412, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Licenses prohibited in certain areas. (a) No license to sell intoxicating liquor may be issued within the following areas: (1) where restricted against commercial use through zoning ordinances and other proceedings or legal processes regularly had for that purpose, except licenses may be issued to restaurants in areas which were restricted against commercial uses after the establishment of the restaurant; (2) within the Capitol or on the Capitol grounds, except as provided under Laws 1983, chapter 259, section 9, or Laws 1999, chapter 202, section 13; (3) on the State Fairgrounds, except as provided under section 37.21, subdivision 2; deleted text begin (4) on the campus of the College of Agriculture of the University of Minnesota; deleted text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end within 1,000 feet of a state hospital, training school, reformatory, prison, or other institution under the supervision or control, in whole or in part, of the Direct Care and Treatment executive board or the commissioner of corrections; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end in a town or municipality in which a majority of votes at the last election at which the question of license was voted upon were not in favor of license under section 340A.416, or within one-half mile of any such town or municipality, except that intoxicating liquor manufactured within this radius may be sold to be consumed outside it; and deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end within 1,500 feet of any public school that is not within a city. (b) The restrictions of this subdivision do not apply to a manufacturer or wholesaler of intoxicating liquor or to a drugstore or to a person who had a license originally issued lawfully prior to July 1, 1967. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end